District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2885.07

Denial, suspension, or revocation of pharmacist’s license or pharmacy intern’s registration.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1102(c), 33 DCR 729

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2007.

Editor's Notes

Section 302 of D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.